Maryland, session 2025, HB1543.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – State Government
9–1E–07.
(J) (1) A SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE ISSUED A LICENSE
UNDER § 9–1E–06(A)(2)(II) OF THIS SUBTITLE MAY SUBMIT A WRITTEN REQUEST TO
THE COMMISSION TO RELOCATE A CLASS B SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY.
(2) THE COMMISSION MAY GRANT A REQUEST SUBMITTED UNDER
PARAGRAPH (1) OF THIS SUBSECTION ONLY IF:
(I) THE SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSEE WAS
ORIGINALLY ISSUED A CLASS B SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY LICENSE ON OR
BEFORE SEPTEMBER 30, 2023; AND
(II) THE NEW LOCATION FOR THE SPORTS WAGERING FACILITY:
1. IS WITHIN THE SAME COUNTY; AND
2. COMPLIES WITH THE LOCATION REQUIREMENTS
UNDER § 9–1E–06 OF THIS SUBTITLE; AND
– 1 –

Ch. 333 2025 LAWS OF MARYLAND
3. SUBJECT TO § 9–1E–15(Q) OF THIS SUBTITLE, IS
APPROVED BY THE SPORTS WAGERING APPLICATION REVIEW COMMISSION.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.
Approved by the Governor, May 6, 2025.
– 2 –